hunspell-lij/lij_IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX vc Y 66
SFX vc 0 0/1'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixi/2' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixe/3'L' diggo
SFX vc iggo immo/4'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo î/5'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixan/6'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixeiva/1'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo iva/1'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixeivo/1'E'-- diggo
SFX vc iggo ivo/1'E'-- diggo
SFX vc iggo ixeivi/2' diggo
SFX vc iggo ivi/2' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixeiva/3'L' diggo
SFX vc iggo iva/3'L' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixeivimo/4'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ivimo/4'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixeivi/5'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ivi/5'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixeivan/6'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ivan/6'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo iò/1'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo iö/1'E'-- diggo
SFX vc iggo iæ/2' diggo
SFX vc iggo ià/3'L' diggo
SFX vc iggo iâ/3'L'-- diggo
SFX vc iggo iemo/4'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo iei/5'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ian/6'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo igghe/1'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo igghi/2' diggo
SFX vc iggo igghe/3'L' diggo
SFX vc iggo immo/4'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo î/5'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo iggan/6'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo isse/1'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixesse/1'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo isci/2' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixesci/2' diggo
SFX vc iggo isse/3'L' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixesse/3'L' diggo
SFX vc iggo iscimo/4'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixescimo/4'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo isci/5'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixesci/5'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo issan/6'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ixessan/6'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ieiva/1'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo iæ/1'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo iësci/2' diggo
SFX vc iggo ieiva/3'L' diggo
SFX vc iggo iæ/3'L' diggo
SFX vc iggo iëscimo/4'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo iësci/5'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo ieivan/6'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo iæn/6'E' diggo
SFX vc iggo inni/ENEMET diggo
SFX vc iggo i/E2~~ diggo
SFX vc iggo immo/ENETES diggo
SFX vc iggo î/ENEMEV diggo
SFX vc iggo ixendo/ENEMETEVES diggo
SFX vc iggo indo/ENEMETEVES diggo
SFX vc iggo î/O'ENEMETEVES diggo
SFX vc iggo ito diggo
SFX vc iggo ita diggo
SFX vc iggo iti diggo
SFX vc iggo ite diggo

SFX vf Y 60
SFX vf 0 0/1'E' fasso
SFX vf asso æ/2' fasso
SFX vf asso a/3'L' fasso
SFX vf asso emmo/4'E' fasso
SFX vf asso æ/5'E' fasso
SFX vf asso an/6'E' fasso
SFX vf asso ava/1'E' fasso
SFX vf asso axeiva/1'E' fasso
SFX vf asso avo/1'E'-- fasso
SFX vf asso axeivo/1'E'-- fasso
SFX vf asso avi/2' fasso
SFX vf asso axeivi/2' fasso
SFX vf asso ava/3'L' fasso
SFX vf asso axeiva/3'L' fasso
SFX vf asso avimo/4'E' fasso
SFX vf asso axeivimo/4'E' fasso
SFX vf asso avi/5'E' fasso
SFX vf asso axeivi/5'E' fasso
SFX vf asso avan/6'E' fasso
SFX vf asso axeivan/6'E' fasso
SFX vf asso aiò/1'E' fasso
SFX vf asso aiö/1'E'-- fasso
SFX vf asso aiæ/2' fasso
SFX vf asso aià/3'L' fasso
SFX vf asso aiâ/3'L'-- fasso
SFX vf asso aiemo/4'E' fasso
SFX vf asso aiei/5'E' fasso
SFX vf asso aian/6'E' fasso
SFX vf asso asse/1'E' fasso
SFX vf asso asci/2' fasso
SFX vf asso asse/3'L' fasso
SFX vf asso emmo/4'E' fasso
SFX vf asso æ/5'E' fasso
SFX vf asso assan/6'E' fasso
SFX vf asso esse/1'E' fasso
SFX vf asso esci/2' fasso
SFX vf asso esse/3'L' fasso
SFX vf asso escimo/4'E' fasso
SFX vf asso esci/5'E' fasso
SFX vf asso essan/6'E' fasso
SFX vf asso aieiva/1'E' fasso
SFX vf asso aiæ/1'E' fasso
SFX vf asso aiësci/2' fasso
SFX vf asso aieiva/3'L' fasso
SFX vf asso aiæ/3'L' fasso
SFX vf asso aiëscimo/4'E' fasso
SFX vf asso aiësci/5'E' fasso
SFX vf asso aieivan/6'E' fasso
SFX vf asso aiæn/6'E' fasso
SFX vf asso anni/ENEMET fasso
SFX vf asso a/E2~~ fasso
SFX vf asso emmo/ENETES fasso
SFX vf asso æ/ENEMEV fasso
SFX vf asso ando/ENEMETEVES fasso
SFX vf asso axendo/ENEMETEVES fasso
SFX vf asso â/O'ENEMETEVES fasso
SFX vf asso æto fasso
SFX vf asso æta fasso
SFX vf asso æti fasso
SFX vf asso æte fasso

SFX vi Y 51
SFX vi 0 0/1'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o i/2' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o e/3'L' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o emmo/4'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o ei/5'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o an/6'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o eiva/1'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o eivo/1'E'-- [xs]iggo
SFX vi o eivi/2' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o eiva/3'L' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o eivimo/4'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o eivi/5'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o eivan/6'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iò/1'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iö/1'E'-- [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iæ/2' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o ià/3'L' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iâ/3'L'-- [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iemo/4'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iei/5'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o ian/6'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o e/1'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o i/2' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o e/3'L' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o emmo/4'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o ei/5'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o an/6'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o esse/1'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o esci/2' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o esse/3'L' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o escimo/4'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o esci/5'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o essan/6'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o ieiva/1'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iæ/1'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iësci/2' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o ieiva/3'L' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iæ/3'L' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iëscimo/4'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iësci/5'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o ieivan/6'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o iæn/6'E' [xs]iggo
SFX vi o i/ENEMETE2 [xs]iggo
SFX vi o emmo/ENETES [xs]iggo
SFX vi o ei/ENEMEV [xs]iggo
SFX vi o endo/ENEMETEVES [xs]iggo
SFX vi o e/O'ENEMETEVES [xs]iggo
SFX vi iggo atto [xs]iggo
SFX vi iggo atta [xs]iggo
SFX vi iggo atti [xs]iggo
SFX vi iggo atte [xs]iggo

SFX nO Y 4
SFX nO o a o
SFX nO o i o
SFX nO o e o
SFX nO so sci so
